Massachusetts, session 194th, H3759.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting following new paragraph:-
The registrar shall furnish, upon application, to owners of private passenger motor
vehicles and motorcycles
who are veterans of the armed forces who honorably served the United States during the
Cold War era, September 2, 1945, to December 26, 1991, and upon upon presentation of
evidence deemed satisfactory by the registrar, distinctive registration plates bearing on the left
side the words "COLD WAR VETERAN". There shall be an annual $20 fee for such "COLD
WAR VETERAN'' plates in addition to the established registration fee for private passenger
motor vehicles and motorcycles. For the purposes of this paragraph, the word "motorcycles''
shall not include motorized bicycles.
of 1